District of Columbia statutes.
25-443

Subpoena of witnesses.

(a)

Subpoenas issued by the Board shall be served:

(1)

By an officer of the Metropolitan Police Department;

(2)

By a special process server, at least 18 years of age, designated by the Board from among the staff appointed by the Board who are not directly involved in the investigation; or

(3)

By a special process server, at least 18 years of age, engaged by the Board for this purpose.

(b)

Witnesses, other than those employed by the District or by the United States, shall be entitled to the same fees as are paid witnesses for attendance before the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(c)

In the case of contumacy or refusal to obey a subpoena, the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, upon written request by the Board, shall issue an order requiring the contumacious person to appear and testify before the Board or to produce evidence if so ordered.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 322, ch. 4, § 6
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 897, ch. 756, § 2
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 3, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(2), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 3, 34 DCR 907
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(c), 41 DCR 1658
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-443.
1973 Ed., § 25-106.